District of Columbia statutes.
29-606.03

Effect of partner’s dissociation.

(a)

If a partner’s dissociation results in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, subchapter VIII of this chapter shall apply; otherwise, subchapter VII of this chapter applies.

(b)

Upon a partner’s dissociation:

(1)

The partner’s right to participate in the management and conduct of the partnership business terminates, except as otherwise provided in § 29-608.03;

(2)

The partner’s duty of loyalty under § 29-604.04(b)(3) terminates; and

(3)

The partner’s duty of loyalty under § 29-604.04(b)(1) and (2) and duty of care under § 29-604.04(c) continue only with regard to matters arising and events occurring before the partner’s dissociation, unless the partner participates in winding up the partnership’s business pursuant to § 29-608.03.

(c)

A person’s dissociation alone does not discharge the person from a debt, obligation, or other liability to the partnership or to the other partners which the person incurred while a partner.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(6)(B), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-601.04.
1981 Ed., § 41-156.3.
2001 Ed., § 33-106.03.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (c).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 603 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.